District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.17

Districts and delegates; classes of members.

(a)

The organic rules may provide for the formation of geographic districts of patron members and:

(1)

For the conduct of patron member meetings by districts and the election of directors at the meetings; or

(2)

That districts may elect district delegates to represent and vote for the district at members meetings.

(b)

A delegate elected under subsection (a)(2) of this section shall have one vote unless voting power is otherwise allocated by the organic rules.

(c)

The organic rules may provide for the establishment of classes of members, for the preferences, rights, and limitations of the classes, and:

(1)

For the conduct of members meetings by classes and the election of directors at the meetings; or

(2)

That classes may elect class delegates to represent and vote for the class in members meetings.

(d)

A delegate elected under subsection (c)(2) of this section shall have one vote unless voting power is otherwise allocated by the organic rules.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1008.04.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 517 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Editor's Notes